src/third-party/hunspell-dictionaries/lt.aff
SFX M Y 41
SFX M is      iai             [^dt]is   
SFX M dis     d iai           dis       
SFX M tis      iai            tis       
SFX M is      ies             is        
SFX M is                      is        
SFX M is      imi             is        
SFX M is      yje             is        
SFX M is      y               is        
SFX M is      ie              is        
SFX M is      ys              is        
SFX M is      ims             is        
SFX M is      imis            is        
SFX M is      yse             is        
SFX M ys      ims             ys        
SFX M ys      is              ys        
SFX M ys      imis            ys        
SFX M ys      yse             ys        
SFX M uo      ers             uo        
SFX M uo      eriai           uo        
SFX M uo      er              uo        
SFX M uo      erimi           uo        
SFX M uo      eryje           uo        
SFX M uo      erie            uo        
SFX M uo      erys            uo        
SFX M uo      er              uo        
SFX M uo      erims           uo        
SFX M uo      eris            uo        
SFX M uo      erimis          uo        
SFX M uo      eryse           uo        
SFX M         ers                       
SFX M         eriai                     
SFX M         er                        
SFX M         erimi                     
SFX M         eryje                     
SFX M         erie                      
SFX M         erys                      
SFX M         er                        
SFX M         erims                     
SFX M         eris                      
SFX M         erimis                    
SFX M         eryse                     

SFX C Y 91
SFX C as      o               as        
SFX C as      am              as        
SFX C as                      as        
SFX C as      uo              as        
SFX C as      ame             as        
SFX C as      ie              as        
SFX C as                      as        
SFX C as      iems            as        
SFX C as      uos             as        
SFX C as      ais             as        
SFX C as      uose            as        
SFX C s       io              ks        
SFX C s       iam             ks        
SFX C s                       ks        
SFX C s       iu              ks        
SFX C s       iame            ks        
SFX C s       ie              ks        
SFX C s       i               ks        
SFX C s       iems            ks        
SFX C s       ius             ks        
SFX C s       iais            ks        
SFX C s       iuose           ks        
SFX C is      io              [^j]is    
SFX C is      iam             [^j]is    
SFX C is                      [^j]is    
SFX C is      iuo             [^j]is    
SFX C is      iame            [^j]is    
SFX C is      ie              [^j]is    
SFX C is      i               [^j]is    
SFX C is      iems            [^j]is    
SFX C is      iuos            [^j]is    
SFX C is      iais            [^j]is    
SFX C is      iuose           [^j]is    
SFX C is      o               jis       
SFX C is      am              jis       
SFX C is                      jis       
SFX C is      uo              jis       
SFX C is      ame             jis       
SFX C is      ie              jis       
SFX C is                      jis       
SFX C is      iems            jis       
SFX C is      uos             jis       
SFX C is      ais             jis       
SFX C is      uose            jis       
SFX C a       os              a         
SFX C a       ai              a         
SFX C a                       a         
SFX C a       a               a         
SFX C a       oje             a         
SFX C a                       a         
SFX C a       oms             a         
SFX C a       as              a         
SFX C a       omis            a         
SFX C a       ose             a         
SFX C i       os              ji        
SFX C i       ai              ji        
SFX C i                       ji        
SFX C i       a               ji        
SFX C i       oje             ji        
SFX C i       oj              ji        
SFX C i                       ji        
SFX C i       oms             ji        
SFX C i       as              ji        
SFX C i       omis            ji        
SFX C i       ose             ji        
SFX C 0       os              [^j]i     
SFX C 0       ai              [^j]i     
SFX C 0                       [^j]i     
SFX C 0       a               [^j]i     
SFX C 0       oje             [^j]i     
SFX C 0       oj              [^j]i     
SFX C 0                       [^j]i     
SFX C 0       oms             [^j]i     
SFX C 0       as              [^j]i     
SFX C 0       omis            [^j]i     
SFX C 0       ose             [^j]i     
SFX C du      dviej           udu       
SFX C du      dviem           udu       
SFX C du      dviejuose       udu       
SFX C dvi     dviej           udvi      
SFX C dvi     dviem           udvi      
SFX C dvi     dviejose        udvi      
SFX C uodu     dviej          uodu      
SFX C uodu    iedviem         uodu      
SFX C uodu    iemdviem        uodu      
SFX C iedu     dviej          iedu      
SFX C iedu    iedviem         iedu      
SFX C iedu    iemdviem        iedu      
SFX C iedvi    dviej          iedvi     
SFX C iedvi   omdviem         iedvi     
SFX C iedvi   odviem          iedvi     

SFX B Y 44
SFX B is      io              [^dt]is   
SFX B is      iam             [^dt]is   
SFX B is                      [^dt]is   
SFX B is      iu              [^dt]is   
SFX B is      iame            [^dt]is   
SFX B is      iai             [^dt]is   
SFX B is      i               [^dt]is   
SFX B is      iams            [^dt]is   
SFX B is      ius             [^dt]is   
SFX B is      iais            [^dt]is   
SFX B is      iuose           [^dt]is   
SFX B tis      io             tis       
SFX B tis      iam            tis       
SFX B tis     t               tis       
SFX B tis      iu             tis       
SFX B tis      iame           tis       
SFX B tis      iai            tis       
SFX B tis      i              tis       
SFX B tis      iams           tis       
SFX B tis      ius            tis       
SFX B tis      iais           tis       
SFX B tis      iuose          tis       
SFX B dis     d io            dis       
SFX B dis     d iam           dis       
SFX B dis     d               dis       
SFX B dis     d iu            dis       
SFX B dis     d iame          dis       
SFX B dis     d iai           dis       
SFX B dis     d i             dis       
SFX B dis     d iams          dis       
SFX B dis     d ius           dis       
SFX B dis     d iais          dis       
SFX B dis     d iuose         dis       
SFX B is                      is        
SFX B is       s              is        
SFX B is      ei              is        
SFX B is                      is        
SFX B is      e               is        
SFX B is       je             is        
SFX B is       j              is        
SFX B is       ms             is        
SFX B is      es              is        
SFX B is       mis            is        
SFX B is       se             is        
