src/third-party/hunspell-dictionaries/lt.dic
agresinis/BN
akis/IM
aklatis/IM
akordinis/BN
alerginis/BN
alternatyvinis/BN
aminor g tis/IM
amplitudinis/BN
ana/C
anas/C
an d linis/BN
angis/IM
anglis/IM
aniedvi/C
ank tis/DIM
anodinis/BN
anokia/C
anoks/C
antikinis/BN
antis/DIM
antisemitinis/BN
antraeilis/BN
antvandeninis/BN
anuodu/C
apgaut /IM
apgintis/IM
apibr  tis/IM
apimtis/IM
apyankstis/BN
apydr tis/BN
apykartis/BN
apymink tis/BN
apyraudonis/BN
apyskystis/BN
apysveikis/BN
apyv lis/BN
apsiaustis/IM
apsimestinis/BN
apskritis/IMV
apsuptis/IM
aptartis/IM
archetipinis/BN
artezinis/BN
asimetrinis/BN
a is/IM
astronominis/BN
atbulinis/BN
ateitis/IM
atimtis/IM
atitiktis/IM
atmintinis/BN
atmintis/IM
atremtis/IM
atskirtis/IM
atspirtis/IM
atvestinis/BN
auk talipis/BN
ausis/KM
autoimuninis/BN
autostotis/IM
avis/IM
avi ainis/BDN
baigtis/DIMT
balioninis/BN
bambukinis/BN
beaistris/BN
begalinis/BN
bemar kinis/BN
bendratis/IM
be alis/BN
bevaldis/BN
bizantinis/BN
bjaurastis/IM
bjauratis/IM
blandis/IM
blu nis/IM
brandis/IM
budis/IM
buitis/IM
bukstis/IM
bulvinis/BN
ciklinis/BN
dabartis/IM
dalis/IM
dantis/IKMV
darvinistinis/BN
daugiamolekulis/BN
daugiavielis/BN
debesis/IKMV
deguonis/IMV
deminutyvinis/BN
d tis/IMT
devyniaauk tis/BN
did iulis/BN
dieveris/IM
dingstis/IM
dispe erinis/BN
dobstis/IM
drebutinis/BN
drumstis/IMT
dukt /DM
durys/DKM
dvarionis/IM
dvia is/BN
dvinamis/BN
dvitraukis/BDN
d i tis/IM
egzotinis/BN
elektromechaninis/BN
epochinis/BN
fanerinis/BN
flanelinis/BN
gai atis/IM
gaisrinis/BN
gai tis/IM
garank tis/IM
gele inis/BDN
gele is/KM
geluonis/IM
gentis/IM
gerab dis/BN
gintis/IMT
gyvastis/IM
gyvuonis/IM
gl binis/BN
grandis/IM
grau atis/IM
greiferinis/BN
grindis/IM
grindys/KM
gri tis/IM
gr stis/IMT
gr  tis/IM
guls ia gis/BN
hidroterapinis/BN
ielak tis/IM
ielaktis/IM
ietis/IMT
ikimokyklinis/BN
ilgastiebis/BN
ilgatis/IM
iltis/IM
imtis/IMT
infantilinis/BN
intranzityvinis/BN
i eitis/IM
i imtis/IM
i mestinis/BN
i mintis/IM
i pa intis/IM
i skirtis/IM
i tiktis/IM
i tremtis/IM
i vestis/IM
i vyktis/IM
jaunatis/IM
jausminis/BN
ji/C
jiedu/C
jiedvi/C
jis/C
jokia/C
joks/C
judu/C
judvi/C
jungtis/IMT
juodkaklis/BN
juodu/C
kadrinis/BN
kam atis/IM
kandis/DIM
kanonierinis/BN
kar atis/IM
kartis/DIMT
kartografinis/BN
kas/CN
katra/C
katras/C
katriedvi/C
katruodu/C
kaulinis/BN
ka kas/C
ka katra/C
ka katras/C
ka kokia/C
ka koks/C
ka kuri/C
ka kuris/C
kepenys/DKM
keturakis/BN
ketvirtametis/BN
kibirk tis/IM
kiltis/IM
kininis/BN
kirk nis/IM
kirmis/IM
kita/CD
kitokia/C
kitoks/C
kl tis/IM
klintis/IM
kli tis/IM
klotis/IMTV
knyginis/BN
kokia/CN
koks/CN
kompromisinis/BN
kontinentinis/BN
kosminis/BN
kreiptis/IMT
krepinis/BN
kryptis/IM
krytis/DIM
krosnis/IM
kr snis/IM
kr tis/KM
kulk nis/IM
kulnis/IM
kult rinis/BN
kuri/C
kuriedvi/C
kuris/C
kuriuodu/C
labiodentalinis/BN
landuonis/IM
ledyninis/BN
liaudis/IM
liepsninis/BN
lygia onis/BN
lygtis/IMT
magistralinis/BN
magztis/IM
mak tis/IM
mar kininis/BN
ma meninis/BN
menkavertis/BN
mie inis/BN
mirtis/IM
mi riakraujis/BN
moreninis/BN
mudu/C
mudvi/C
naktis/KM
narkotinis/BN
nerimastis/IM
nertis/IMT
neuralginis/BN
neviltis/IM
nuo ukinis/BDN
nutartis/IM
omenis/IM
optinis/BN
padinis/BN
paleistis/IM
pal margis/BDN
paltis/IM
parapinis/BN
parengtis/IM
pasirinktis/IM
paslaptis/IM
pasninkinis/BN
patartis/IM
patirtis/IM
pavir inis/BN
pa intis/IMT
penkiaskiemenis/BN
personalinis/BN
pertrauktis/DIM
pilnatis/IMV
piritinis/BN
pirtis/IM
pla iakaktis/BDN
pl nis/IM
pleuritinis/BN
plonut lis/BN
pojaunis/BN
popiktis/BN
potankis/BN
pragai tis/IM
prakurtis/IM
pra  tis/IM
predikatinis/BN
prie dujinis/BN
prie tvaninis/BN
prigimtis/IM
profiklaktinis/B
psichinis/BN
pusbadis/BN
pu is/KM
puskr minis/BN
pu nis/KM
pus utis/BN
radiologinis/BN
raudong  is/BN
referatinis/BN
reparacinis/BN
re isierinis/BN
rimtis/IMN
rombinis/BN
r dis/IM
r g tinis/BN
rungtis/IMT
sagtis/IM
samaninis/BN
sausut lis/BN
savastis/IM
segregacinis/BN
septyniaauk tis/BN
sesuo/M
siaura nyplis/BN
simpatinis/BN
skaitytinis/BN
skiltis/IM
skydinis/BN
skrytis/IM
slinktis/IMT
smailiasparnis/BN
smiltis/IM
solinis/BN
sprandinis/BN
spr stis/IM
sritis/IM
statybinis/BN
stora aknis/BN
stuobrinis/BN
sud tis/IM
suimtis/IM
sumai tis/IM
sutartis/IM
sutrauktis/IM
suvereninis/BN
ta/CN
tarifinis/BN
tarpvyriausybinis/BN
tartis/IMT
tas/CN
televizinis/B
t vinis/BN
t vonis/IM
tiedvi/C
tokia/CDN
toks/CN
tolinis/BN
trandis/IM
transportinis/BN
trikartinis/BN
triktis/IM
triskaitis/BN
trumpakojis/BN
tul is/IM
tuodu/C
t rinis/BN
uolektis/IM
uraganinis/BN
u duotis/IM
u mar tis/IM
u piltis/IM
u uomar tis/IM
vabzd dis/BN
vandenne is/BN
v duoklinis/BN
verpatis/IM
vestibuliarinis/BN
vienakamienis/BN
vienasienis/BN
vienbalsis/BDN
vienokia/C
vienoks/C
vienpir tis/BN
vienveiksmis/BN
vilktis/IMT
viltis/IMNT
virdis/IM
vir tarnybinis/BN
visa/CN
visokia/C
visoks/C
visuminis/BN
votis/IM
zoomorfinis/BN
